lexd_components/verbs_irreg.lexd
############
########Irregulars and defective verbs

#####Groupable irregular verbs

LEXICON VerbRootNil		#Class 13 անցնիլ and 14 մեռնիլ
անցնիլ:անց
ընկողմանիլ:ընկողմա   # Dir/LR it's regularized for Hossep, the final V also looks off
բուսնիլ:բուս
հագնիլ:հագ
հասնիլ:հաս
հատնիլ:հատ
մեռնիլ:մեռ
յանդգնիլ:յանդգ
յաւակնիլ:յաւակ
քրտնիլ:քրտ  # Dir/LR it's regularized for Hossep

#------#

LEXICON VerbRootCilV		#Class 15 երկնչիլ; differs from 16 in the imperative
երկնչիլ:երկն

LEXICON VerbRootCilC		#Class 16 կպչիլ 
կորնչիլ:կորն
կորչիլ:կոր
կպչիլ:կպ
մատչիլ:մատ

#------#

LEXICON VerbRootNelNale		#Class 23 իջնել իջնալ and 24 գտնել գտնալ
իջնել:իջ
գտնել:գտ
հեծնել:հեծ
մտնել:մտ
տեսնել:տես

դպնել:դպ #This verb is also CilIl


LEXICON VerbRootNelNala		


իջնալ:իջ
գտնալ:գտ
հեծնալ:հեծ
մտնալ:մտ
տեսնալ:տես

դպնալ:դպ #This verb is also CilIl

#------#

LEXICON VerbRootCilIlc		#Class 26 դպչիլ դպիլ
դպչիլ:դպ
թռչիլ:թռ
փախչիլ:փախ
փակչիլ:փակ
փլչիլ:փլ


LEXICON VerbRootCilIli		# Class 26 դպիլ includes 44
դպիլ:դպ
թռիլ:թռ
փախիլ:փախ
փակիլ:փակ
փլիլ:փլ


LEXICON VerbRootBring  #Class 37 38 արտաբերել բերել
արտաբերել:արտաբեր
բերել:բեր
զոհաբերել:զոհաբեր
մակաբերել:մակաբեր
մտաբերել:մտաբեր
յայտնաբերել:յայտնաբեր
նուիրաբերել:նուիրաբեր
տարուբերել:տարուբեր

LEXICON VerbRootTake		# Class 41 առնել
առնել:առ

LEXICON VerbRootYield # Class 47 զիջիմ զիջայ մի զիջիր մի զիջէք
զիջիլ:զիջ
կարեկցիլ:կարեկց

LEXICON VerbRootAccept # Class 48 ընդունիմ ընդունեցի ընդունեցայ մի ընդունիր մի ընդունէք
ընդունիլ:ընդուն

LEXICON VerbRootSay # Class 50 ըսել
ըսել:ըս
LEXICON VerbRootBite	# Class 53 խածնել
խածնել:խած
պագնել:պագն
LEXICON VerbRootPlay # Class 54 խաղալ խաղցայ խաղացի
խաղալ:խաղ
LEXICON VerbRootStay # Class 55 մնալ
մնալ:մն
ջանալ:ջան
սպառնալ:սպառն
LEXICON VerbRootSit # Class 56 նստիլ
ծնիլ:ծն
նստիլ:նստ
պրծիլ:պրծ
սկսիլ:սկս
վերածնիլ:վերածն
վերսկսիլ:վերսկս
փրթիլ:փրթ

#------------------#
#------------------#
#Suppletives
LEXICON VerbRootRiseEPres		#Class 25 ելլել ելլալ
ելլել:ելլ		
LEXICON VerbRootRiseEPast
ելլալ:ել		
LEXICON VerbRootRiseAPres		
ելլալ:ելլ		
LEXICON VerbRootRiseAPres
ելլալ:ել		
LEXICON VerbRootExist # Class 31 կամ 
կամ:կ
LEXICON VerbRootBeLongPres # Class 33 ըլլալ եղայ
ըլլալ:ըլլ
LEXICON VerbRootBeLongPast
ըլլալ:եղ
LEXICON VerbRootComePres # Class 34 գալ եկայ
գալ:գ
LEXICON VerbRootComePast
գալ:եկ
LEXICON VerbRootCry # Class 35 լալ
լալ:լ
LEXICON VerbRootGivePres # Class 36 տալ տուի
տալ:տ
LEXICON VerbRootGivePast
տալ:տու
LEXICON VerbRootTurnPres	# Class 39 40 անդրադառնալ դառնալ
անդրադառնալ:անդրադառն
դառնալ:դառն
վերադառնալ:վերադառն
LEXICON VerbRootTurnPast
դառնալ:դարձ
անդրադառնալ:անդրադարձ
վերադառնալ:վերադարձ
LEXICON VerbRootOpenPres	# Class 42 բանալ
բանալ:բան
LEXICON VerbRootOpenPast
բանալ:բաց
LEXICON VerbRootPutPres		# Class 43 դնել
դնել:դն
LEXICON VerbRootPutPast
դնել:դր
LEXICON VerbRootPutImpSg
դնել:դ
LEXICON VerbRootGoPres		# Class 45 երթալ
երթալ:երթ
LEXICON VerbRootGoPastLong
երթալ:գաց
LEXICON VerbRootGoPastShort
երթալ:գն
LEXICON VerbRootHitPres		# Class 46 զարնել
զարնել:զարն
LEXICON VerbRootHitPast
զարնել:զարկ
LEXICON VerbRootDoPres # Class 49 ընել
ընել:ըն
LEXICON VerbRootDoPast # ընել
ընել:ըր
LEXICON VerbRootSpitOldPres # Class 51 թքնել
թքնել:թք
LEXICON VerbRootSpitOldImpSg
թքնել:թուք
LEXICON VerbRootFallPres # Class 52 իյնալ
իյնալ:իյն
LEXICON VerbRootFallPast
իյնալ:ինկ
իյնալ:ընկ # Dir/LR
LEXICON VerbRootEatPres # Class 57 ուտել կերայ
ուտել:ուտ
LEXICON VerbRootEatPast 
ուտել:կեր
LEXICON VerbRootSendPres # Class 58 տանիլ տարաւ
տանիլ:տան
LEXICON VerbRootSendPast
տանիլ:տար


#------------------#
#------------------#
#Defectives
LEXICON VerbRootCanShort	#  Class 27 կրնամ կարենալ
կրնամ:կր
LEXICON VerbRootCanLong
կարենալ:կարե
LEXICON VerbRootAppear #Class 28 երեւիլ, has -nal version that's regular
երեւիլ:երեւ
LEXICON VerbRootHave # Class 29 ունիմ, has -enal version that's regular
ունիմ:ուն
LEXICON VerbRootKnow # Class 30 գիտեմ, has -nal version that's regular
գիտեմ:գիտ
